apertium-ur-hi.hi.dix
    <pardef n="कुछ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="स/ा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="फी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="कई/अ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अ</l>
          <r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अ</l>
          <r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अ</l>
          <r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अ</l>
          <r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Verbs -->
    <pardef n="होना__vbser">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
   

    <pardef n="हैं__vblex">

                <e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>

               </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="है__vblex">

                <e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>

               </pardef>
   
   
    <pardef n="थी_vblex">

                <e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>

               </pardef>
   
   
    <pardef n="सके__vbmod">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="vbmod"/></r></p></e>
     
    </pardef>

    <!-- Determiners -->


    <pardef n="एक__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Postpositions -->

    <pardef n="ने__post">
    
         <e><p><l/><r><s n="post"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/का__post">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>का</l>
          <r>का<s n="post"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>के</l>
          <r>का<s n="post"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>के</l>
          <r>का<s n="post"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>के</l>
          <r>का<s n="post"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>की</l>
          <r>का<s n="post"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>की</l>
          <r>का<s n="post"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>की</l>
          <r>का<s n="post"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>की</l>
          <r>का<s n="post"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Adverbs -->

    
    <pardef n="गलत__adv">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <!-- Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="और__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="अगर__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="आठ__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="का"><i>का</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के लिये"><i>के<b/>लिये</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ने"><i>ने</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="को"><i>को</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="से"><i>से</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के लिये"><i>के<b/>लिये</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के द्वारा"><i>के<b/>द्वारा</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="में"><i>में</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="पर"><i>पर</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के"><i>के</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="की"><i>की</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="और"><i>और</i><par n="और__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="पर"><i>पर</i><par n="और__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="मगर"><i>मगर</i><par n="और__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="अगर"><i>अगर</i><par n="अगर__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="अगरचे"><i>अगरचे</i><par n="अगर__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="कि"><i>कि</i><par n="अगर__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ताकि"><i>ताकि</i><par n="अगर__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="यदि"><i>यदि</i><par n="अगर__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="हालांकि"><i>हालांकि</i><par n="अगर__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="या"><i>या</i><par n="अगर__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="समान"><i>समान</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="तीन"><i>तीन</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="एक हज़ार"><i>एक हज़ार</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="पैंतीस"><i>पैंतीस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="सोलह"><i>सोलह</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="बत्तीस"><i>बत्तीस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="थोड़ा भी"><i>थोड़ा भी</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="सैंतालीस"><i>सैंतालीस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="तेतालीस"><i>तेतालीस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="इकतीस"><i>इकतीस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="तेंतीस"><i>तेंतीस</i><par n="आठ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="हुए"><i>हुए</i><par n="हैं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बोलते"><i>बोलते</i><par n="हैं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="मिला"><i>मिला</i><par n="है__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सकती"><i>सकती</i><par n="है__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="भागता"><i>भागता</i><par n="है__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="होना"><i>होना</i><par n="होना__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="हैं"><i>हैं</i><par n="हैं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="थी"><i>थी</i><par n="थी_vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सके"><i>सके</i><par n="सके__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="करता"><i>करता</i><par n="है__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="देखती"><i>देखती</i><par n="है__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="खेलते"><i>खेलते</i><par n="हैं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हो"><i>हो</i><par n="होना__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="हुई"><i>हुई</i><par n="होना__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="लेती"><i>लेती</i><par n="है__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बताएं"><i>बताएं</i><par n="है__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="चाहती"><i>चाहती</i><par n="है__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सुन्नी"><i>सुन्नी</i><par n="है__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="चाहिए "><i>चाहिए</i><par n="है__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="जाते"><i>जाते</i><par n="है__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="उतनी"><i>उतनी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खुरदरा"><i>खुरदर</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अयोनिअ"><i>अयोनि</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुहारिअ"><i>अनुहारि</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फलाँअ"><i>फलाँ</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खडा"><i>खड</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="द्रोही"><i>द्रोही</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उपश्रोता"><i>उपश्रोत</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कलमुहाँअ"><i>कलमुहाँ</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="आग्रही"><i>आग्रही</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="औँधा"><i>औँध</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="हैवानी"><i>हैवानी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खोटा"><i>खोट</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनेक"><i>अनेक</i><par n="कुछ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चारुदर्शना"><i>चारुदर्शन</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="छमछम"><i>छमछम</i><par n="कुछ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मृदंगी"><i>मृदंगी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चिनिया"><i>चिनिय</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="शतवार्षिकी"><i>शतवार्षिकी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नितांत"><i>नितांत</i><par n="कुछ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अमोघदृष्टिअ"><i>अमोघदृष्टि</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मोचयिता"><i>मोचयित</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अश्वारूढ"><i>अश्वारूढ</i><par n="कुछ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="लुढकनी"><i>लुढकनी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अल्पायुअ"><i>अल्पायु</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="रमता"><i>रमत</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="निरुपयोगी"><i>निरुपयोगी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कईअ"><i>कई</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अव्यवसायी"><i>अव्यवसायी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मुजरा"><i>मुजर</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अमृत्युअ"><i>अमृत्यु</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कलही"><i>कलही</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="औंधा"><i>औंध</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फलाँफलाँअ"><i>फलाँफलाँ</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मंगलकारी"><i>मंगलकारी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अप्रभुअ"><i>अप्रभु</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बाजरूअ"><i>बाजरू</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पीला"><i>पील</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="लगभग"><i>लगभग</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="उलटा"><i>उलटा</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="आवेगशील"><i>आवेगशील</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="फट"><i>फट</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="कल"><i>कल</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रफुल्लतापूर्वक"><i>प्रफुल्लतापूर्वक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="कलाकार-मंडली"><i>कलाकार-मंडली</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="क्रूरतापूर्वक"><i>क्रूरतापूर्वक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="एकदम"><i>एकदम</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="कटुतापूर्वक"><i>कटुतापूर्वक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सतर्कतापूर्वक"><i>सतर्कतापूर्वक</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
